src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_AHL_STEM_3_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - áljahl - ENGLISH : # CLASS_AHL_STEM_3

     áljahl+V+Interr+Past: áljaalaa
     áljahl+V+Indir+Past: áljaalaan
     áljahl+V+Rel+Evid: áljaalaas
     áljahl+V+Past+NonFact: áljaalaa.ang
     áljahl+V+Cert+Pres: áljaalʼahlanggang
     áljahl+V+Cert+Past: áljaalʼahlanggan
     áljahl+V+Cert+Past+Hab: áljaalʼahlanggiinii
     áljahl+V+Cert+Rel: áljaalʼahlans
     áljahl+V+Ints+Past: áljaalaaʼahlang
     áljahl+V+Cont: áljaalaaʼahlanggaa
     áljahl+V+Ctfact+Pres: áljaalaaʼahlanggang
     áljahl+V+Rflx: áljaalʼahl
